Washington statutes.
RCW 5.28.020

How administered.

An oath may be administered as follows: The person who swears holds up his or her hand, while the person administering the oath thus addresses him or her: "You do solemnly swear that the evidence you shall give in the issue (or matter) now pending between . . . . . . . . and . . . . . . . . shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, so help you God." If the oath be administered to any other than a witness giving testimony, the form may be changed to: "You do solemnly swear you will true answers make to such questions as you may be asked," etc.

[ 2011 c 336 s 132; 2 H. C. s 1694; 1869 p 378 s 2; RRS s 1265.]